en: Canned porcini mushrooms, Canned porcini, Canned penny bun, Canned porcino, Canned Boletus edulis
es: Boletos comestibles en conserva, Boletus comestible en conserva, Setas de calabaza en conserva, Boletus edulis en conserva
fr: Cèpes en conserve, Cèpes de Bordeaux en conserve, Boletus edulis en conserve
hr: Konzervirani vrganji
nl: Gewoon eekhoorntjesbrood in blik/pot

en: Canned red pine mushrooms, Canned saffron milk caps, Canned Lactarius deliciosus
es: Níscalos en conserva, Lactarius deliciosus en conserva
fr: Lactaires délicieux en conserve, Rudes en conserve, Lactarius deliciosus en conserve
hr: Gljive crvene borovice iz konzerve
nl: Oranjegroene melkzwammen in blik/pot, Smakelijke melkzwammen in blik/pot

en: Canned shiitake mushrooms, Canned shiitake, Canned Lentinula edodes
es: Setas shiitake en conserva, Shiitake en conserva, Setas shitake en conserva, Shitake en conserva, Lentinula edodes en conserva
fr: Champignons shiitake en conserve, Shiitake en conserve, Lentins du chêne en conserve, Lentinula edodes en conserve
hr: Konzervirane shiitake gljive
nl: Shiitakes in blik/pot

en: Canned mixed mushrooms
es: Mezclas de setas en conserva, Surtidos de setas en conserva, Surtido de setas en conserva, Setas surtidas en conserva
fr: Mélanges de champignons en conserve
hr: Konzervirane miješane gljive
nl: Paddestoelmengsels in blik/pot

en: Canned truffles
es: Trufas en conserva
fr: Truffes en conserve
hr: Konzervirani tartufi
nl: Truffels in blik/pot

en: Frozen mushrooms
bg: Замразени гъби
de: Gefrorene Pilze
es: Setas congeladas, Hongos congelados
fi: pakastetut sienet
fr: Champignons surgelés
hr: Smrznute gljive
it: Funghi surgelati
nl: Diepvriespaddestoelen
pl: Grzyby mrożone

en: Frozen chanterelle mushrooms, Frozen golden chanterelles, Frozen girolles
es: Rebozuelos congelados, Chantarelas congeladas, Setas rebozuelo congeladas
fr: Girolles surgelés, Girolle surgelé, Jaunotte surgelé, Jauniré surgelé, Cantharellus cibarius surgelés, Chanterelle ciboire surgelés, chevrette surgelé, roussotte surgelé, gallinace surgelé
hr: Smrznute gljive lisičarke
nl: Diepvries cantharellen, Diepvries hanekammen

en: Frozen champignon mushrooms, Frozen common mushrooms, Frozen white mushrooms, Frozen white button mushrooms, Frozen button mushrooms, Frozen Agaricus bisporus, Frozen cultivated mushrooms
es: Champiñones congelados, Champiñones de París congelados, Champiñones comunes congelados, Champiñones blancos congelados, Agaricus bisporus congelados
fr: Champignons de Paris surgelés, Agaricus bisporus surgelés, Champignons de couche surgelés
hr: Smrznuti šampinjoni
nl: Diepvries champignons

en: Frozen sliced champignon mushrooms, Frozen sliced common mushrooms, Frozen sliced white mushrooms, Frozen sliced white button mushrooms, Frozen sliced button mushrooms
de: Gefrorene Champignons in Scheiben, Gefrorene Champignonscheiben
es: Champiñones laminados congelados, Champiñones de París laminados congelados
fr: Champignons de Paris émincés surgelés
hr: Smrznuti narezani šampinjoni
nl: Gesneden diepvrieschampignons

en: Frozen whole champignon mushrooms, Frozen whole common mushrooms, Frozen whole white mushrooms, Frozen whole white button mushrooms, Frozen whole button mushrooms
es: Champiñones enteros congelados, Champiñones de París enteros congelados
fr: Champignons de Paris entiers surgelés
hr: Smrznuti cijeli šampinjoni
nl: Hele diepvrieschampignons

en: Frozen oyster mushrooms, Frozen Pleurotus ostreatus
es: Setas de ostra congeladas, Setas ostra congeladas, Champiñones ostra congelados, Gírgolas congelados, Pleurotus ostreatus congelados
fr: Pleurotes en huître surgelé, Pleurotus ostreatus surgelé
hr: Smrznute bukovače
nl: Diepvriesoesterzwammen

en: Frozen porcini mushrooms, Frozen porcini, Frozen penny bun, Frozen porcino, Frozen Boletus edulis
es: Boletos comestibles congelados, Boletus comestible congelado, Setas de calabaza congeladas, Boletus edulis congelados, Setas Boletus edulis congeladas, Boletus edulis congeladas
fr: Cèpes surgelés, Cèpes de Bordeaux surgelés, Boletus edulis surgelés
hr: Smrznuti vrganji
nl: Diepvries gewoon eekhoorntjesbrood

en: Frozen chopped porcini mushrooms, Frozen chopped porcini, Frozen chopped penny bun, Frozen chopped porcino, Frozen chopped Boletus edulis
es: Boletos comestibles troceados congelados, Boletus comestible troceado congelado, Setas de calabaza troceadas congeladas, Boletus edulis troceados congelados, Setas Boletus edulis troceadas congeladas, Boletus edulis troceados congeladas
fr: Cèpes hachés surgelés, Cèpes de Bordeaux hachés surgelés, Boletus edulis hachés surgelés
hr: Smrznuti nasjeckani vrganji
nl: Diepvries gehakt gewoon eekhoorntjesbrood

en: Frozen whole porcini mushrooms, Frozen whole porcini, Frozen whole penny bun, Frozen whole porcino, Frozen whole Boletus edulis
es: Boletos comestibles enteros congelados, Boletus comestible entero congelado, Setas de calabaza enteras congeladas, Boletus edulis enteros congelados, Setas Boletus edulis enteras congeladas, Boletus edulis enteros congeladas
fr: Cèpes entiers surgelés, Cèpes de Bordeaux entiers surgelés, Boletus edulis entiers surgelés
hr: Smrznuti cijeli vrganji
nl: Diepvries hele gewoon eekhoorntjesbrood

en: Frozen mixed mushrooms
es: Mezclas de setas congeladas, Mezclas de hongos congelados, Surtidos de setas congeladas, Surtidos de hongos congelados, Surtido de setas congeladas
fr: Mélanges de champignons surgelés
hr: Smrznute miješane gljive
nl: Diepvries paddestoelenmengsels

en: Dried mushrooms
de: Getrocknete Pilze
es: Setas deshidratadas, Hongos deshidratados, Setas desecadas, Hongos desecados
fi: kuivatut sienet
fr: Champignons séchés, Champignons secs, Champignons déshydratés
hr: Sušene gljive
it: Funghi secchi
nl: Gedroogde paddestoelen
pl: Grzyby suszone

en: Dried horn of plenty mushrooms, Dried horn of plenty
es: Setas trompeta de los muertos deshidratadas, Trompetas de los muertos deshidratadas, Trompetas de la muerte deshidratadas
fr: Trompettes des morts secs, Craterelles en forme de corne d'abondance secs, Cornes d'abondance secs, Trompettes de la mort secs
hr: Sušeni rog obilja gljiva
nl: Gedroogde Doodstrompetten, Gedroogde Hoorn van overvloeds

en: Dried jew's ear mushrooms, Dried wood ear mushrooms, Dried jelly ear mushrooms
es: Setas orejas de Judas deshidratadas, Orejas de Judas deshidratadas
fr: Oreilles de Judas secs, Oreilles du diable secs
hr: Sušene pečurke
nl: Gedroogde judasoren
pl: Suszone grzyby mun

en: Dried mixed mushrooms
es: Mezclas de setas deshidratadas, Surtidos de setas deshidratadas, Setas surtidas deshidratadas
fr: Mélanges de champignons secs
hr: Sušene miješane gljive
nl: Gedroogde paddestoelenmengsels

en: Dried oyster mushrooms
es: Setas de ostra deshidratadas, Setas ostra deshidratadas, Champiñones ostra deshidratadas, Gírgolas deshidratadas
fr: Pleurotes en huître secs
hr: Sušene bukovače
nl: Gedroogde oesterzwammen